Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 9. Actions by Crime Victims.

Cross references. —

For attorney fees in actions by crime victims, see AS

09.60.070

.

Sec. 09.55.650.
Claim based on sexual abuse to a minor under 16 years of age.

A person who, as a minor under 16 years of age, was the victim of sexual abuse may maintain an action for recovery of damages against the perpetrator of the act or acts of sexual abuse based on the perpetrator’s intentional conduct for an injury or condition suffered as a result of the sexual abuse.

If the defendant committed more than one act of sexual abuse on the plaintiff, the plaintiff is not required to prove which specific act caused the injury.

In this section, “sexual abuse” means an act committed by the defendant against the plaintiff maintaining the cause of action if the defendant’s conduct would have violated a provision of AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.440

or

11.41.450

—

11.41.458

, former AS 11.15.120, 11.15.134, or 11.15.160, or former AS 11.40.110 at the time it was committed.

History.

(§ 4 ch 4 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 81 SLA 1998)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 11, ch. 4, SLA 1990 provides that this section applies “to all actions commenced on or after February 2, 1990, regardless of when the cause of action may have arisen.”